italian.lexc
Multichar_Symbols +N +V +J +Sg +Pl +Presente +1P +2P +3P GUESS

LEXICON Root

Noun ;
Verb ;
Adjective ;

LEXICON Noun

GUESS Ninf;

LEXICON Verb

GUESS Vinf;

LEXICON Adjective

GUESS Jinf;

LEXICON Ninf

+N+Sg:0  #;
+N+Pl:^s #;

LEXICON Vinf

+V:0                    #;
+V+Presente+Sg+1P:^o    #;
+V+Presente+Sg+2P:^i    #;
+V+Presente+Sg+3P:^a    #;
+V+Presente+Pl+1P:^iamo #;
+V+Presente+Pl+2P:^ate  #;
+V+Presente+Pl+3P:^ano  #;

LEXICON Jinf

+J:0     #;
